Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.327

Unfinished frames or receivers—Exceptions—Penalties.

(1) After March 10, 2023, no person may knowingly or recklessly possess, transport, or receive an unfinished frame or receiver, unless: (a) The party possessing, transporting, or receiving the unfinished frame or receiver is a law enforcement agency or a federal firearms importer, federal firearms manufacturer, or federal firearms dealer; or (b) the unfinished frame or receiver has been imprinted with a serial number issued by a federal firearms importer, federal firearms manufacturer, or federal firearms dealer.

(2) No person may sell, offer to sell, transfer, or purchase an unfinished frame or receiver, unless: (a) The party purchasing the unfinished frame or receiver is a federal firearms importer, federal firearms manufacturer, or federal firearms dealer; or (b) the unfinished frame or receiver has been imprinted with a serial number issued by a federal firearms importer, federal firearms manufacturer, or federal firearms dealer.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any unfinished frame or receiver that has been imprinted by a federal firearms dealer or other federal licensee authorized to provide marking services as provided for in RCW 9.41.328.

(4)(a) Any person who violates this section commits a civil infraction and shall be assessed a monetary penalty of $500.

(b) If a person previously has been found to have violated this section, then the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW for each subsequent violation of this section.

(c) If a person previously has been found to have violated this section two or more times, then the person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW for each subsequent violation of this section.

(d) If a person violates this section by possessing, transporting, receiving, selling, offering to sell, transferring, or purchasing three or more unfinished frames or receivers at a time, then the person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW for each violation of this section.

(e) A person commits a separate violation of this section for each and every unfinished frame or receiver to which this section applies.

[ 2022 c 105 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 105: See note following RCW 7.80.120.